Louisiana, session 2026, HB562.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:961(F)(1)(w) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§961. Court reporters; generally
* * *
F.(1)
* * *
(w) In the Nineteenth Judicial District Court, court reporter fees shall be as
follows:
(i) In all civil and non-indigent criminal cases, a fee not to exceed six dollars
per thirty-two-line page transcript and not to exceed two dollars per page per
certified copy reported and transcribed shall be charged by and paid to the court
reporter who reported and transcribed the testimony.
(ii) In all criminal indigent cases, a fee not to exceed three dollars and fifty
cents per thirty-two-line page transcript and not to exceed one dollar per page per
certified copy reported and transcribed shall be charged by and paid to the court
reporter who reported and transcribed the testimony.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1025 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 562
(iii) When an expedited transcript is requested, the following expedited fees
may be charged:
(a) For transcription within twenty-four hours, a court reporter may charge
two times the allowable per page rate set pursuant to Subsubparagraph (w)(i) of this
Paragraph.
(b) For transcription within forty-eight hours, a court reporter may charge
an additional three dollars per page over the allowable per page rate set pursuant to
Subsubparagraph (w)(i) of this Paragraph.
(c) For transcription within five days, a court reporter may charge an
additional one dollar per page over the allowable per page rate set pursuant to
Subsubparagraph (w)(i) of this Paragraph.